Utah statutes.
59-13-205.   License certificate -- Display at place of business -- Failure to secure license -- Penalties.

(1)  Each distributor of motor fuel shall, at all times, conspicuously display at the distributor's place of business or agency a license certificate issued by the commission.

(2)  If any person becomes a distributor, without first securing the license required by this part, the motor fuel tax shall be immediately due and payable on account of all motor fuel received.  The commission shall proceed immediately to determine the amount of distributions and shall assess immediately the motor fuel tax on account of the distributions, adding to the motor fuel tax a penalty for failure to secure the license as provided in Section 59-1-401.



Enacted by Chapter 6, 1987 General Session

